Nebraska, session 109, LB561.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 60-601, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
60-601 Sections 60-601 to 60-6,383 and section 4 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Rules of the Road.
Sec. 2. Section 60-6,290, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
60-6,290 (1)(a) No vehicle shall exceed a length of forty feet, extreme
overall dimensions, inclusive of front and rear bumpers including load, except
that:
(i) A bus or a motor home, as defined in section 71-4603, may exceed the
forty-foot limitation but shall not exceed a length of forty-five feet;
(ii) A truck-tractor may exceed the forty-foot limitation;
(iii) A semitrailer operating in a truck-tractor single semitrailer
combination, which semitrailer was actually and lawfully operating in the State
of Nebraska on December 1, 1982, may exceed the forty-foot limitation;
(iv) A semitrailer operating in a truck-tractor single semitrailer
combination, which semitrailer was not actually and lawfully operating in the
State of Nebraska on December 1, 1982, may exceed the forty-foot limitation but
shall not exceed a length of fifty-three feet including load;
(v) A semitrailer operating in a truck-tractor single semitrailer
combination, while transporting baled livestock forage, may exceed the forty-
foot limitation but shall not exceed a length of fifty-nine feet six inches
including load;
(vi) An articulated bus vehicle operated by a transit authority
established under the Transit Authority Law or regional metropolitan transit
authority established pursuant to section 18-804 may exceed the forty-foot
limitation. For purposes of this subdivision (vi), an articulated bus vehicle
shall not exceed sixty-five feet in length; and
(vii) A truck may exceed the forty-foot limitation but shall not exceed a
length of forty-five feet.
(b) No combination of vehicles shall exceed a length of sixty-five feet,
extreme overall dimensions, inclusive of front and rear bumpers and including
load, except:
(i) One truck and one trailer, loaded or unloaded, used in transporting
implements of husbandry to be engaged in harvesting, while being transported
into or through the state during daylight hours if the total length does not
exceed seventy-five feet including load;
(ii) A truck-tractor single semitrailer combination;
(iii) A truck-tractor semitrailer trailer combination, but the semitrailer
trailer portion of such combination shall not exceed sixty-five feet inclusive
of connective devices;
(iv) A driveaway saddlemount vehicle transporter combination and driveaway
saddlemount with fullmount vehicle transporter combination, but the total
overall length shall not exceed ninety-seven feet;
(v) A stinger-steered automobile transporter, but the total overall length
shall not exceed eighty feet, inclusive of a front overhang of less than four
feet and a rear overhang of less than six feet. For purposes of this
subdivision, automobile transporter means any vehicle combination designed and
used for the transport of assembled highway vehicles, including truck camper
units. An automobile transporter shall not be prohibited from the transport of
cargo or general freight on a backhaul, so long as it is in compliance with
weight limitations for a truck-tractor and semitrailer combination; and
(vi) A towaway trailer transporter combination, but the total overall
length shall not exceed eighty-two feet. For purposes of this subdivision,
towaway trailer transporter combination means a combination of vehicles
consisting of a trailer transporter towing unit and two trailers or
semitrailers with a total weight that does not exceed twenty-six thousand
pounds, and in which the trailers or semitrailers carry no property and
constitute inventory property of a manufacturer, distributor, or dealer of such
trailers or semitrailers.
(c) A truck shall be construed to be one vehicle for the purpose of
determining length.
(d) A trailer shall be construed to be one vehicle for the purpose of
-1-

LB561 LB561
2025 2025
determining length.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Extra-long vehicles which have been issued a permit pursuant to
section 60-6,292;
(b) Vehicles which have been issued a permit pursuant to section 60-6,299;
(c) The temporary moving of farm machinery during daylight hours in the
normal course of farm operations;
(d) The movement of unbaled livestock forage vehicles, loaded or unloaded;
(e) The movement of public utility or other construction and maintenance
material and equipment at any time;
(f) Farm equipment dealers or their representatives as authorized under
section 60-6,382 driving, delivering, or picking up farm equipment or
implements of husbandry within the county in which the dealer maintains his or
her place of business, or in any adjoining county or counties, and return;
(g) The overhang of any motor vehicle being hauled upon any lawful
combination of vehicles, but such overhang shall not exceed the distance from
the rear axle of the hauled motor vehicle to the closest bumper thereof;
(h) The overhang of a combine to be engaged in harvesting, while being
transported into or through the state driven during daylight hours by a truck-
tractor semitrailer combination, but the length of the semitrailer, including
overhang, shall not exceed sixty-three feet and the maximum semitrailer length
shall not exceed fifty-three feet;
(i) Any self-propelled specialized mobile equipment with a fixed load when
the requirements of subdivision (2)(i) of section 60-6,288 are met; or
(j) One truck-tractor two trailer combination or one truck-tractor
semitrailer trailer combination used in transporting equipment utilized by
custom harvesters under contract to agricultural producers to harvest wheat,
soybeans, or milo during the months of April through November but the length of
the property-carrying units, excluding load, shall not exceed eighty-one feet
six inches; or .
(k) An overweight raw-milk vehicle for which a length exception has been
granted under section 4 of this act.
(3) The length limitations of this section shall be exclusive of safety
and energy conservation devices such as rearview mirrors, turnsignal lights,
marker lights, steps and handholds for entry and egress, flexible fender
extensions, mudflaps and splash and spray suppressant devices, load-induced
tire bulge, refrigeration units or air compressors, and other devices necessary
for safe and efficient operation of commercial motor vehicles, except that no
device excluded from the limitations of this section shall have by its design
or use the capability to carry cargo.
Sec. 3. Section 60-6,298, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-6,298 (1)(a) The Department of Transportation or the Nebraska State
Patrol, with respect to highways under its jurisdiction including the National
System of Interstate and Defense Highways, and local authorities, with respect
to highways under their jurisdiction, may in their discretion upon application
and good cause being shown therefor issue a special, continuing, or continuous
permit in writing authorizing the applicant or his or her designee:
(i) To operate or move a vehicle, a combination of vehicles, or objects of
a size or weight of vehicle or load exceeding the maximum specified by law when
such permit is necessary:
(A) To further the national defense or the general welfare;
(B) To permit movement of cost-saving equipment to be used in highway or
other public construction or in agricultural land treatment; or
(C) Because of an emergency, an unusual circumstance, or a very special
situation;
(ii) To operate vehicles, for a distance up to one hundred twenty miles,
loaded up to fifteen percent greater than the maximum weight specified by law,
or up to ten percent greater than the maximum length specified by law, or both,
except that any combination with two or more cargo-carrying units, not
including the truck-tractor, also known as a longer combination vehicle, may
only operate for a distance up to seventy miles loaded up to fifteen percent
greater than the maximum weight specified by law, or up to ten percent greater
than the maximum length specified by law, or both, when carrying grain or other
seasonally harvested products from the field where such grain or products are
harvested to storage, market, or stockpile in the field or from stockpile or
farm storage to market or factory when failure to move such grain or products
in abundant quantities would cause an economic loss to the person or persons
whose grain or products are being transported or when failure to move such
grain or products in as large quantities as possible would not be in the best
interests of the national defense or general welfare. The distance limitation
may be waived for vehicles when carrying dry beans or dry peas and lentils from
the field where harvested to storage or market when dry beans or dry peas and
lentils are not normally stored, purchased, or used within the permittee's
local area and must be transported more than one hundred twenty miles to an
available marketing or storage destination. No permit shall authorize a weight
greater than twenty thousand pounds on any single axle;
(iii) To transport an implement of husbandry which does not exceed twelve
and one-half feet in width during daylight hours, except that the permit shall
not allow transport on holidays;
(iv) To operate one or more recreational vehicles, as defined in section
71-4603, exceeding the maximum width specified by law if movement of the
recreational vehicles is prior to retail sale and the recreational vehicles
-2-

LB561 LB561
2025 2025
comply with subdivision (2)(k) of section 60-6,288;
(v) To operate an emergency vehicle for purposes of sale, demonstration,
exhibit, or delivery, if the applicant or his or her designee is a manufacturer
or sales agent of the emergency vehicle. No permit shall be issued for an
emergency vehicle which weighs over sixty thousand pounds on the tandem axle;
or
(vi) To transport during daylight hours divisible loads of livestock
forage in bale form which do not exceed twelve feet in width, except that the
permit shall not allow transport on holidays; or .
(vii) To operate overweight raw-milk vehicles carrying raw milk from a
dairy farm to a processing facility for such raw milk in accordance with
section 4 of this act.
(b) No permit shall be issued under subdivision (a)(i) of this subsection
for a vehicle carrying a load unless such vehicle is loaded with an object
which exceeds the size or weight limitations, which cannot be dismantled or
reduced in size or weight without great difficulty, and which of necessity must
be moved over the highways to reach its intended destination. No permit shall
be required for the temporary movement on highways other than dustless-surfaced
state highways and for necessary access to points on such highways during
daylight hours of cost-saving equipment to be used in highway or other public
construction or in agricultural land treatment when such temporary movement is
necessary and for a reasonable distance.
(2) The application for any such permit shall specifically describe the
vehicle, the load to be operated or moved, whenever possible the particular
highways for which permit to operate is requested, and whether such permit is
requested for a single trip or for continuous or continuing operation. The
permit shall include a signed affirmation under oath that, for any load sixteen
feet high or higher, the applicant has contacted any and all electric utilities
that have high voltage conductors and infrastructure that cross over the
roadway affected by the move and made arrangements with such electric utilities
for the safe movement of the load under any high voltage conductors owned by
such electric utilities.
(3) The department or local authority is authorized to issue or withhold
such permit at its discretion or, if such permit is issued, to limit the number
of days during which the permit is valid, to limit the number of trips, to
establish seasonal or other time limitations within which the vehicles
described may be operated on the highways indicated, or to issue a continuous
or continuing permit for use on all highways, including the National System of
Interstate and Defense Highways. The permits are subject to reasonable
conditions as to periodic renewal of such permit and as to operation or
movement of such vehicles. The department or local authority may otherwise
limit or prescribe conditions of operation of such vehicle or vehicles, when
necessary to assure against undue damage to the road foundations, surfaces, or
structures or undue danger to the public safety. The department or local
authority may require such undertaking or other security as may be deemed
necessary to compensate for any injury to any roadway or road structure.
(4) Every such permit shall be carried in the vehicle to which it refers
and shall be open to inspection by any peace officer, carrier enforcement
officer, or authorized agent of any authority granting such permit. Each such
permit shall state the maximum weight permissible on a single axle or
combination of axles and the total gross weight allowed. No person shall
violate any of the terms or conditions of such special permit. In case of any
violation, the permit shall be deemed automatically revoked and the penalty of
the original limitations shall be applied unless:
(a) The violation consists solely of exceeding the size or weight
specified by the permit, in which case only the penalty of the original size or
weight limitation exceeded shall be applied; or
(b) The total gross load is within the maximum authorized by the permit,
no axle is more than ten percent in excess of the maximum load for such axle or
group of axles authorized by the permit, and such load can be shifted to meet
the weight limitations of wheel and axle loads authorized by such permit. Such
shift may be made without penalty if it is made at the state or commercial
scale designated in the permit. The vehicle may travel from its point of origin
to such designated scale without penalty, and a scale ticket from such scale,
showing the vehicle to be properly loaded and within the gross and axle weights
authorized by the permit, shall be reasonable evidence of compliance with the
terms of the permit; or .
(c) Such permit is an overweight raw-milk vehicle permit and the
overweight raw-milk vehicle violated subsection (3) of section 4 of this act.
(5) The department or local authority issuing a permit as provided in this
section may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations with respect to the
issuance of permits provided for in this section.
(6) The department shall make available applications for permits
authorized pursuant to subdivisions (1)(a)(ii) and (1)(a)(iii) of this section
in the office of each county treasurer. The department may make available
applications for all other permits authorized by this section to the office of
the county treasurer and may make available applications for all permits
authorized by this section to any other location chosen by the department.
(7) The department or local authority issuing a permit may require a
permit fee of not to exceed twenty-five dollars, except that:
(a) The fee for a continuous or continuing permit may not exceed twenty-
five dollars for a ninety-day period, fifty dollars for a one-hundred-eighty-
day period, or one hundred dollars for a one-year period; and
-3-

LB561 LB561
2025 2025
(b) The fee for permits issued pursuant to subdivision (1)(a)(ii) of this
section shall be twenty-five dollars. Permits issued pursuant to such
subdivision shall be valid for thirty days and shall be renewable four times
for a total number of days not to exceed one hundred fifty days per calendar
year.
A vehicle or combination of vehicles for which an application for a permit
is requested pursuant to this section shall be registered under section
60-3,147 or 60-3,198 for the maximum gross vehicle weight that is permitted
pursuant to section 60-6,294 before a permit shall be issued.
Sec. 4. (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Raw milk needs to be promptly processed;
(b) Lawful truck weight requirements can lead to an inability to haul all
available raw milk produced at a dairy farm, which results in some raw milk
being wasted;
(c) There has been a reduction in the availability of raw milk processing
facilities in this state; and
(d) The opportunity and need for overweight raw-milk vehicle permits to
operate overweight raw-milk vehicles to carry only raw milk from a dairy farm
to a milk processing facility for such raw milk is needed due to 23 U.S.C.
127(a)(13), as such section existed on January 1, 2025, concerning the carrying
of fluid milk products.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Bridge map means the map described in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Department means the Department of Transportation;
(c) Overweight raw-milk vehicle means a vehicle that has been issued and
currently holds an overweight raw-milk vehicle permit;
(d) Overweight raw-milk vehicle permit means a valid special, continuing,
or continuous overweight raw-milk vehicle permit issued under section 60-6,298
to carry raw milk from a dairy farm to a processing facility for such raw milk;
and
(e) Prohibited bridge structure means a bridge structure identified as
prohibited on the bridge map.
(3) An overweight raw-milk vehicle shall:
(a) Not exceed a gross weight of one hundred seven thousand five hundred
pounds;
(b) For each single axle and each group of axles on the truck-tractor and
the hauling tanker trailer, not exceed the weight limits calculated using the
federal bridge formula identified in 23 U.S.C. 127, as such section existed on
January 1, 2025;
(c) Carry a physical or digital copy of the bridge map;
(d) Not enter any prohibited bridge structure; and
(e) Not travel on the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways,
unless authorized by the department on the overweight raw-milk vehicle permit
pursuant to written approval from the Federal Highway Administration for such
authorization.
(4)(a) Prior to January 1, 2026, the department shall create a map of
bridge structures in this state onto which an overweight raw-milk vehicle shall
not enter.
(b) The department shall review the bridge map at least once each year and
make any necessary updates to the bridge map.
(c) The department shall publish the most recent version of the bridge map
on the public website provided by the department.
(5)(a) The department may revoke the overweight raw-milk vehicle permit
for any overweight raw-milk vehicle that violates subsection (3) of this
section.
(b) Any such revocation shall not become effective until the holder of any
such revoked permit has been provided written notice by the department of such
revocation. Any such notice provided by United States mail is not effective
until received by the holder of the revoked permit.
(c) Any such revocation may be appealed by the holder of the revoked
permit. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act.
(6) If the department determines that overweight raw-milk vehicle permits
put this state at risk of losing federal aid funding, the department shall
revoke all such permits.
(7) For any overweight raw-milk vehicle that enters a prohibited bridge
structure and is the proximate cause of damage to the prohibited bridge
structure, the owner of the overweight raw-milk vehicle shall be liable for all
costs associated with repairing such damage. The department may bring an action
to recover such costs associated with repairing such damage in the district
court of the county where the prohibited bridge structure is located or in the
district court of Lancaster County. Any money recovered in such action shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Roads Operations Cash Fund.
(8) The department may grant an exception to section 60-6,290 regarding
the length of a vehicle if such length is reasonable and is needed for an
overweight raw-milk vehicle to comply with all weight limits for single axles
and groups of axles.
Sec. 5. Original section 60-6,298, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and sections 60-601 and 60-6,290, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
are repealed.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-4-